New York, session 2025-2026, S8900.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4 of the veterans' services law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 40 to read as follows: 3 40. To obtain contact information from the United States department of 4 veterans affairs related to any New York state veterans discharged from 5 active service, and to transfer such information to the appropriate 6 county veteran service agency. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13498-02-6